src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-TA
та-ков+Adv+Indef+Lat:та-ков INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-косо+Adv+Indef+Ine:та-косо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-косто+Adv+Indef+Ela:та-косто INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-кода+Adv+Indef+Manner:та-кода INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-кува+Adv+Indef+Prl:та-кува INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-зярдо+Adv+Indef+Sem/Time:та-зярдо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-зяро+Adv+Indef+Nom:та-зяро INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-зяроксть+Adv+Indef+Iter:та-зяроксть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-зярс+Adv+Indef+Ill+Sem/Time:та-зярс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

та-зярдонь+A+Indef+Sem/Time:та-зярдонь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-знярдо+Adv+Indef:та-знярдо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-зняро+Adv:та-зняро INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

!зняро+Adv+Indef+Ela:та-зняросто INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-знярс+Adv+Indef+Ill:та-знярс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-знярдонь+A+Indef+Der/GenAttr:та-знярдонь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-кодамо+A+Indef+Nom+Sg:та-кодамо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-кодамо+A+Indef+Nom+Pl:та-кодат INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
та-кодамо+A+Indef+Pl+Nom+Def:та-кодатнэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!2017-11-05кона+Det+Indef+Nom+Sg:та-кона INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!2022-03-18!та-мезе+Pron+Indef:та-мӒ4 Indef_MEZE_Cases_FOLLOWED_BY_MARKER ;
!мезень+Pron+Indef+Gen:та-мезень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!та-мезе+Pron+Indef+Nom+Pl:та-мезть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!та-мезе+Pron+Indef+Orth/PhonInfl+Nom+Pl:та-месть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!та-мекс+Pron+Indef+Tra:та-мекс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Abl:та-мезде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Dat:та-мезнень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Abl+Def:та-мезденть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Ine:та-мейсэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

та-зняро+Pron:та-зняро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

та-кодамо+A+Indef+Pl:та-кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!кодамо+Adn:та-кодам Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

та-кона+Det+Indef:та-кона NMN_KUDO ;

та-зяро+Adv:та-зяро _KUDO-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

та-мезе+Det+Dep+Gen:та-мень Indef_Pronouns-K-post ; !This one cannot take prefix
!та-мезе+Pron:та-мезь _OSH-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!та-кие+Pron+Indef:та-ки INDEF-KIE-CASES ;



!LEXICON PRON-INDEF-ELA
!+Indef+Ela: # ;

LEXICON INDEFINITE-PRON

@U.INDEF.BUTI@ INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-BUTI ;
@U.INDEF.GAK@ INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-GAK ;

@U.INDEF.KOI@ INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-KOI ;
@U.INDEF.TAGO@ INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-TAGO ;
@U.INDEF.TA@ INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-TA ;

@U.INDEF.KOI@кой-:@U.INDEF.KOI@кой- INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-KOI/TA/TAGO ;
@U.INDEF.TAGO@таго-:@U.INDEF.TAGO@таго- INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-KOI/TA/TAGO ;
@U.INDEF.TA@та-:@U.INDEF.TA@та- INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-KOI/TA/TAGO ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_KOJ-MEZE
@U.INDEF.KOI@+Indef:@U.INDEF.KOI@ Indef_MEZE_Cases_FOLLOWED_BY_MARKER ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF-HUM_KIE-BUTI
@U.INDEF.BUTI@+Indef:@U.INDEF.BUTI@ INDEF-KIE-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON_INDEF_MEZE-BUTI ! мезе-бути:мӒ4
@U.INDEF.BUTI@+Indef:@U.INDEF.BUTI@ Indef_MEZE_Cases_FOLLOWED_BY_MARKER ;

LEXICON PRON_INDEF_MEZEJAK
@U.INDEF.GAK@+Indef:@U.INDEF.GAK@ Indef_MEZE_Cases_FOLLOWED_BY_MARKER ;

LEXICON INDEF-KIE-CASES
+Pl+Nom:%>ть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Abe:%>втеме INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Abl:%>де INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Dat:%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Ela:%>ньстэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Ela:%>стэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Gen:%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Ill:%>ньс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Ill:%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Ine:%>ньсэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Ine:%>сэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+Sg+Nom:е INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+Sg+Nom: INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 


LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl+Nom:%>VLossт%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+Pl+Nom:%>т%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ill:%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Dat:%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ela+Der/GenAttr:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Abl+Der/GenAttr:%>%{дт%}О1%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ine+Der/GenAttr:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Gen:%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%}нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}з%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Dial/NW:%>%{оеэØ%}м{ое%}к INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

LEXICON Indef_MEZE_Cases_FOLLOWED_BY_MARKER !мезе-бути:мӒ4
+Pl+Nom+Indef:зь%>т%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+Pl+Nom+Indef+Use/SpellNoSugg:сь%>т%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
+SP+Abe+Indef:зе%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:зь%>%{дт%}О1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:зе%>%{дт%}О1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:з%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:зе%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ela+Indef:й%>ст%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ela+Indef:зе%>ст%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:зе%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:й%>с%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:зе%>с%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:й%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:зе%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:зе INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+SP+Ela+Der/GenAttr:й%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ela+Der/GenAttr:зе%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Abl+Der/GenAttr:з%>%{дт%}О1%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Abl+Der/GenAttr:зе%>%{дт%}О1%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine+Der/GenAttr:й%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine+Der/GenAttr:зе%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;

+Pl+Abe+Def:з%>тне%>втеме INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:з%>тнеде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:з%>тне%>шка INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:з%>тне%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:з%>тне%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:з%>тне%>стэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:з%>тне%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:з%>тне%>сэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Lat+Def:з%>тне%>в INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:з%>тне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:з%>тне%>кс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Abl+Def:з%>денть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:зе%>нтень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:зе%>нть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:зе%>сь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:й%>сь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:зем INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:зеть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:зезэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:зенек INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Dial/NW:земек INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:зенк INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:зест INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

LEXICON INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-GAK 
кодамояк+A+Indef+Pl:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
